sk_SK-spell/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
PFX 746 Y 1
PFX 746 0 naj .
SFX 747 Y 1
SFX 747 ý šiu .
PFX 747 Y 1
PFX 747 0 naj .
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 ý šou .
PFX 748 Y 1
PFX 748 0 naj .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 a 0 .
PFX 749 Y 1
PFX 749 bl bĺ .
SFX 750 N 1
SFX 750 in ín .
SFX 751 N 1
SFX 751 ňa nence .
SFX 752 N 1
SFX 752 ňa niat .
SFX 753 N 1
SFX 753 ňa neniec .
SFX 754 N 1
SFX 754 ňa nencom .
SFX 755 N 1
SFX 755 ňa nencoch .
SFX 756 N 1
SFX 756 ňa nencami .
SFX 757 N 1
SFX 757 ťať tím .
SFX 758 N 1
SFX 758 ťať tíš .
SFX 759 N 1
SFX 759 ťať tí .
SFX 760 N 1
SFX 760 ťať tíme .
SFX 761 N 1
SFX 761 ťať títe .
SFX 762 N 1
SFX 762 ťať tia .
SFX 763 N 1
SFX 763 ťať ti .
SFX 764 N 1
SFX 764 ťať time .
SFX 765 N 1
SFX 765 ťať tite .
SFX 766 N 1
SFX 766 ťať tiac .
SFX 767 N 1
SFX 767 on na .
SFX 768 N 1
SFX 768 on novi .
SFX 769 N 1
SFX 769 on nom .
SFX 770 N 1
SFX 770 on ni .
SFX 771 N 1
SFX 771 on nov .
SFX 772 N 1
SFX 772 on noch .
SFX 773 N 1
SFX 773 on nami .
SFX 774 N 1
SFX 774 ízko ižšie .
SFX 775 N 1
SFX 775 zko ž .
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 ízko ižšie .
PFX 776 Y 1
PFX 776 0 naj .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 zko ž .
PFX 777 Y 1
PFX 777 0 naj .
SFX 778 N 1
SFX 778 ízky ižší .
SFX 779 N 1
SFX 779 ízky ižšieho .
SFX 780 N 1
SFX 780 ízky ižšiemu .
SFX 781 N 1
SFX 781 ízky ižšom .
SFX 782 N 1
SFX 782 ízky ižším .
SFX 783 N 1
SFX 783 ízky ižších .
SFX 784 N 1
SFX 784 ízky ižšími .
SFX 785 N 1
SFX 785 ízky ižšie .
SFX 786 N 1
SFX 786 ízky ižšia .
SFX 787 N 1
SFX 787 ízky ižšej .
SFX 788 N 1
SFX 788 ízky ižšiu .
SFX 789 N 1
SFX 789 ízky ižšou .
SFX 790 Y 1
SFX 790 ízky ižší .
PFX 790 Y 1
PFX 790 0 naj .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 ízky ižšieho .
PFX 791 Y 1
PFX 791 0 naj .
SFX 792 Y 1
SFX 792 ízky ižšiemu .
PFX 792 Y 1
PFX 792 0 naj .
SFX 793 Y 1
SFX 793 ízky ižšom .
PFX 793 Y 1
PFX 793 0 naj .
SFX 794 Y 1
SFX 794 ízky ižším .
PFX 794 Y 1
PFX 794 0 naj .
SFX 795 Y 1
SFX 795 ízky ižších .
PFX 795 Y 1
PFX 795 0 naj .
SFX 796 Y 1
SFX 796 ízky ižšími .
PFX 796 Y 1
PFX 796 0 naj .
SFX 797 Y 1
SFX 797 ízky ižšie .
PFX 797 Y 1
PFX 797 0 naj .
SFX 798 Y 1
SFX 798 ízky ižšia .
PFX 798 Y 1
PFX 798 0 naj .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 ízky ižšej .
PFX 799 Y 1
PFX 799 0 naj .
SFX 800 Y 1
SFX 800 ízky ižšiu .
PFX 800 Y 1
PFX 800 0 naj .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 ízky ižšou .
PFX 801 Y 1
PFX 801 0 naj .
SFX 802 N 1
SFX 802 octa ôct .
SFX 803 N 1
SFX 803 to oho .
SFX 804 N 1
SFX 804 to omu .
SFX 805 N 1
SFX 805 to om .
SFX 806 N 1
SFX 806 to ým .
SFX 807 N 1
SFX 807 o ím .
SFX 808 N 1
SFX 808 oka ôk .
SFX 809 N 1
SFX 809 ko iek .
SFX 810 N 1
SFX 810 ero ier .
SFX 811 N 1
SFX 811 ieť ím .
SFX 812 N 1
SFX 812 ieť íš .
SFX 813 N 1
SFX 813 ieť í .
SFX 814 N 1
SFX 814 ieť íme .
SFX 815 N 1
SFX 815 ieť íte .
SFX 816 N 1
SFX 816 eť a .
SFX 817 N 1
SFX 817 lieť ľ .
SFX 818 N 1
SFX 818 lieť ľme .
SFX 819 N 1
SFX 819 lieť ľte .
SFX 820 N 1
SFX 820 eť ac .
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 a 0 .
PFX 821 Y 1
PFX 821 bo bô .
SFX 822 N 1
SFX 822 anza ánz .
SFX 823 N 1
SFX 823 o áe .
SFX 824 N 1
SFX 824 osa ôs .
SFX 825 N 1
SFX 825 ky ok .
SFX 826 N 1
SFX 826 te ťa .
SFX 827 N 1
SFX 827 te ťu .
SFX 828 N 1
SFX 828 te ťom .
SFX 829 N 1
SFX 829 e ia .
SFX 830 N 1
SFX 830 ište íšť .
SFX 831 N 1
SFX 831 te ťami .
SFX 832 N 1
SFX 832 lá iel .
SFX 833 N 1
SFX 833 el och .
SFX 834 N 1
SFX 834 alo ál .
SFX 835 N 1
SFX 835 ažda ážd .
SFX 836 N 1
SFX 836 rať eriem .
SFX 837 N 1
SFX 837 rať erieš .
SFX 838 N 1
SFX 838 rať erie .
SFX 839 N 1
SFX 839 rať erieme .
SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 rať eriete .
SFX 841 N 1
SFX 841 rať erú .
SFX 842 N 1
SFX 842 rať er .
SFX 843 N 1
SFX 843 rať erme .
SFX 844 N 1
SFX 844 rať erte .
SFX 845 N 1
SFX 845 rať erúc .
SFX 846 N 1
SFX 846 tať ci .
SFX 847 N 1
SFX 847 tať cime .
SFX 848 N 1
SFX 848 tať cite .
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 e 0 .
PFX 849 Y 1
PFX 849 br bŕ .
SFX 850 N 1
SFX 850 rdo ŕd .
SFX 851 N 1
SFX 851 chať šem .
SFX 852 N 1
SFX 852 chať šeš .
SFX 853 N 1
SFX 853 chať še .
SFX 854 N 1
SFX 854 chať šeme .
SFX 855 N 1
SFX 855 chať šete .
SFX 856 N 1
SFX 856 chať šú .
SFX 857 N 1
SFX 857 chať š .
SFX 858 N 1
SFX 858 chať šme .
SFX 859 N 1
SFX 859 chať šte .
SFX 860 N 1
SFX 860 chať šúc .
SFX 861 N 1
SFX 861 eno ien .
SFX 862 N 1
SFX 862 ä ena .
SFX 863 N 1
SFX 863 ä enu .
SFX 864 N 1
SFX 864 ä ene .
SFX 865 N 1
SFX 865 ä enom .
SFX 866 N 1
SFX 866 ä ená .
SFX 867 N 1
SFX 867 ä ien .
SFX 868 N 1
SFX 868 ä enám .
SFX 869 N 1
SFX 869 ä enách .
SFX 870 N 1
SFX 870 ä enami .
SFX 871 N 1
SFX 871 eza iez .
SFX 872 N 1
SFX 872 va iev .
SFX 873 N 1
SFX 873 rko ŕk .
SFX 874 N 1
SFX 874 rna ŕn .
SFX 875 N 1
SFX 875 nieť ň .
SFX 876 N 1
SFX 876 nieť ňme .
SFX 877 N 1
SFX 877 nieť ňte .
SFX 878 N 1
SFX 878 iť a .
SFX 879 N 1
SFX 879 iť ac .
SFX 880 N 1
SFX 880 ucho úch .
SFX 881 N 1
SFX 881 rva ŕv .
SFX 882 N 1
SFX 882 no án .
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 a 0 .
PFX 883 Y 1
PFX 883 br bŕ .
SFX 884 N 1
SFX 884 niť ň .
SFX 885 N 1
SFX 885 niť ňme .
SFX 886 N 1
SFX 886 niť ňte .
SFX 887 N 1
SFX 887 ivo ív .
SFX 888 N 1
SFX 888 on nu .
SFX 889 N 1
SFX 889 on ne .
SFX 890 N 1
SFX 890 on ny .
SFX 891 N 1
SFX 891 ta át .
SFX 892 N 1
SFX 892 ea ou .
SFX 893 Y 1
SFX 893 a 0 .
PFX 893 Y 1
PFX 893 bu bú .
SFX 894 N 1
SFX 894 eľa ieľ .
SFX 895 N 1
SFX 895 ursa ús .
SFX 896 N 1
SFX 896 oa uovi .
SFX 897 N 1
SFX 897 oa uom .
SFX 898 N 1
SFX 898 oa uovia .
SFX 899 N 1
SFX 899 oa uov .
SFX 900 N 1
SFX 900 oa uoch .
SFX 901 N 1
SFX 901 ľva liev .
SFX 902 N 1
SFX 902 yro ýr .
SFX 903 N 1
SFX 903 á ých .
SFX 904 N 1
SFX 904 á ým .
SFX 905 N 1
SFX 905 á ými .
SFX 906 N 1
SFX 906 lí ľom .
SFX 907 N 1
SFX 907 lí ľou .
SFX 908 N 1
SFX 908 yľ ýľ .
SFX 909 N 1
SFX 909 yľa ýľ .
SFX 910 N 1
SFX 910 yť udeme .
SFX 911 N 1
SFX 911 yť udete .
SFX 912 N 1
SFX 912 yť udú .
SFX 913 N 1
SFX 913 yť udem .
SFX 914 N 1
SFX 914 yť udeš .
SFX 915 N 1
SFX 915 yť ude .
SFX 916 N 1
SFX 916 yť uď .
SFX 917 N 1
SFX 917 yť uďme .
SFX 918 N 1
SFX 918 yť uďte .
SFX 919 N 1
SFX 919 yť ol .
SFX 920 N 1
SFX 920 yť ola .
SFX 921 N 1
SFX 921 yť olo .
SFX 922 N 1
SFX 922 yť oli .
SFX 923 N 1
SFX 923 ocha ôch .
SFX 924 N 1
SFX 924 ä ence .
SFX 925 N 1
SFX 925 ä eniec .
SFX 926 N 1
SFX 926 ä encom .
SFX 927 N 1
SFX 927 ä encoch .
SFX 928 N 1
SFX 928 ä encami .
SFX 929 N 1
SFX 929 áť ojím .
SFX 930 N 1
SFX 930 áť ojíš .
SFX 931 N 1
SFX 931 áť ojí .
SFX 932 N 1
SFX 932 áť ojíme .
SFX 933 N 1
SFX 933 áť ojíte .
SFX 934 N 1
SFX 934 áť oja .
SFX 935 N 1
SFX 935 áť oj .
SFX 936 N 1
SFX 936 áť ojme .
SFX 937 N 1
SFX 937 áť ojte .
SFX 938 N 1
SFX 938 áť ojac .
SFX 939 N 1
SFX 939 uť em .
SFX 940 N 1
SFX 940 uť eš .
SFX 941 N 1
SFX 941 uť e .
SFX 942 N 1
SFX 942 uť eme .
SFX 943 N 1
SFX 943 uť ete .
SFX 944 N 1
SFX 944 uť i .
SFX 945 N 1
SFX 945 uť ime .
SFX 946 N 1
SFX 946 uť ite .
SFX 947 N 1
SFX 947 nuť ol .
SFX 948 N 1
SFX 948 nuť la .
SFX 949 N 1
SFX 949 nuť lo .
SFX 950 N 1
SFX 950 nuť li .
SFX 951 N 1
SFX 951 aza ázam .
SFX 952 N 1
SFX 952 aza ázach .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 a 0 .
PFX 953 Y 1
PFX 953 ca cá .
SFX 954 N 1
SFX 954 o i .
SFX 955 N 1
SFX 955 io í .
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 a 0 .
PFX 956 Y 1
PFX 956 c ci .
SFX 957 N 1
SFX 957 ev vi .
SFX 958 N 1
SFX 958 ev vou .
SFX 959 N 1
SFX 959 ev ví .
SFX 960 N 1
SFX 960 ev vám .
SFX 961 N 1
SFX 961 ev vách .
SFX 962 N 1
SFX 962 ev vami .
SFX 963 N 1
SFX 963 ov vi .
SFX 964 N 1
SFX 964 ov vou .
SFX 965 N 1
SFX 965 ov ví .
SFX 966 N 1
SFX 966 ov vám .
SFX 967 N 1
SFX 967 ov vách .
SFX 968 N 1
SFX 968 ov vami .
SFX 969 N 1
SFX 969 uza úz .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 o 0 .
PFX 970 Y 1
PFX 970 c ci .
SFX 971 Y 1
SFX 971 ovať ujeme .
PFX 971 Y 1
PFX 971 0 po .
SFX 972 Y 1
SFX 972 ovať ujete .
PFX 972 Y 1
PFX 972 0 po .
SFX 973 Y 1
SFX 973 ovať ujú .
PFX 973 Y 1
PFX 973 0 po .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 ovať ujem .
PFX 974 Y 1
PFX 974 0 po .
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 ovať uješ .
PFX 975 Y 1
PFX 975 0 po .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 ovať uje .
PFX 976 Y 1
PFX 976 0 po .
SFX 977 N 1
SFX 977 _on eň .
SFX 978 N 1
SFX 978 _ono eň .
SFX 979 Y 1
SFX 979 a 0 .
PFX 979 Y 1
PFX 979 cha chá .
SFX 980 N 1
SFX 980 ajda ájd .
SFX 981 N 1
SFX 981 uha úh .
SFX 982 N 1
SFX 982 upa úp .
SFX 983 N 1
SFX 983 arta árt .
SFX 984 N 1
SFX 984 ieť em .
SFX 985 N 1
SFX 985 ieť eš .
SFX 986 N 1
SFX 986 ieť e .
SFX 987 N 1
SFX 987 ieť eme .
SFX 988 N 1
SFX 988 ieť ete .
SFX 989 N 1
SFX 989 ieť ú .
SFX 990 N 1
SFX 990 eť 0 .
SFX 991 N 1
SFX 991 eť me .
SFX 992 N 1
SFX 992 eť te .
SFX 993 N 1
SFX 993 ieť úc .
SFX 994 N 1
SFX 994 ito ít .
SFX 995 N 1
SFX 995 ieb eba .
SFX 996 N 1
SFX 996 ieb ebu .
SFX 997 N 1
SFX 997 ieb ebe .
SFX 998 N 1
SFX 998 ieb ebom .
SFX 999 N 1
SFX 999 ieb eby .
SFX 1000 N 1
SFX 1000 ieb ebov .
SFX 1001 N 1
SFX 1001 ieb eboch .
SFX 1002 N 1
SFX 1002 ieb ebmi .
SFX 1003 N 1
SFX 1003 ať u .
SFX 1004 N 1
SFX 1004 ať uc .
SFX 1005 N 1
SFX 1005 tať cu .
SFX 1006 N 1
SFX 1006 tať cuc .
SFX 1007 N 1
SFX 1007 ol lu .
SFX 1008 N 1
SFX 1008 ol le .
SFX 1009 N 1
SFX 1009 ol ly .
SFX 1010 N 1
SFX 1010 oba ôb .
SFX 1011 N 1
SFX 1011 en na .
SFX 1012 N 1
SFX 1012 en nu .
SFX 1013 N 1
SFX 1013 en ne .
SFX 1014 N 1
SFX 1014 en nom .
SFX 1015 N 1
SFX 1015 en ny .
SFX 1016 N 1
SFX 1016 en nov .
SFX 1017 N 1
SFX 1017 en noch .
SFX 1018 N 1
SFX 1018 en nami .
SFX 1019 N 1
SFX 1019 át ta .
SFX 1020 N 1
SFX 1020 át tu .
SFX 1021 N 1
SFX 1021 át te .
SFX 1022 N 1
SFX 1022 át tom .
SFX 1023 N 1
SFX 1023 át ty .
SFX 1024 N 1
SFX 1024 át tov .
SFX 1025 N 1
SFX 1025 át toch .
SFX 1026 N 1
SFX 1026 át tami .
SFX 1027 N 1
SFX 1027 eľ le .
SFX 1028 N 1
SFX 1028 eľ ľov .
SFX 1029 N 1
SFX 1029 eľ ľoch .
SFX 1030 N 1
SFX 1030 eľ ľami .
SFX 1031 N 1
SFX 1031 ľať lem .
SFX 1032 N 1
SFX 1032 ľať leš .
SFX 1033 N 1
SFX 1033 ľať le .
SFX 1034 N 1
SFX 1034 ľať leme .
SFX 1035 N 1
SFX 1035 ľať lete .
SFX 1036 N 1
SFX 1036 ľať li .
SFX 1037 N 1
SFX 1037 ľať lime .
SFX 1038 N 1
SFX 1038 ľať lite .
SFX 1039 N 1
SFX 1039 ieť 0 .
SFX 1040 N 1
SFX 1040 ieť me .
SFX 1041 N 1
SFX 1041 ieť te .
SFX 1042 N 1
SFX 1042 unta únt .
SFX 1043 N 1
SFX 1043 ieť ejem .
SFX 1044 N 1
SFX 1044 ieť eješ .
SFX 1045 N 1
SFX 1045 ieť eje .
SFX 1046 N 1
SFX 1046 ieť ejeme .
SFX 1047 N 1
SFX 1047 ieť ejete .
SFX 1048 N 1
SFX 1048 yba ýb .
SFX 1049 N 1
SFX 1049 ďa dence .
SFX 1050 N 1
SFX 1050 ďa deniec .
SFX 1051 N 1
SFX 1051 ďa dencom .
SFX 1052 N 1
SFX 1052 ďa dencoch .
SFX 1053 N 1
SFX 1053 ďa dencami .
SFX 1054 N 1
SFX 1054 ať iam .
SFX 1055 N 1
SFX 1055 ať iaš .
SFX 1056 N 1
SFX 1056 ať iame .
SFX 1057 N 1
SFX 1057 ať iate .
SFX 1058 N 1
SFX 1058 ľa ieľ .
SFX 1059 N 1
SFX 1059 i mi .
SFX 1060 N 1
SFX 1060 ulum úl .
SFX 1061 N 1
SFX 1061 ano án .
SFX 1062 N 1
SFX 1062 ipa íp .
SFX 1063 N 1
SFX 1063 unt a .
SFX 1064 N 1
SFX 1064 nt 0 .
SFX 1065 N 1
SFX 1065 unt om .
SFX 1066 N 1
SFX 1066 unt 0 .
SFX 1067 N 1
SFX 1067 unt ach .
SFX 1068 N 1
SFX 1068 unt ami .
SFX 1069 Y 1
SFX 1069 a 0 .
PFX 1069 Y 1
PFX 1069 ci cí .
SFX 1070 N 1
SFX 1070 ino ín .
SFX 1071 N 1
SFX 1071 ino ína .
SFX 1072 N 1
SFX 1072 ino ínam .
SFX 1073 N 1
SFX 1073 ino ínach .
SFX 1074 N 1
SFX 1074 ino ínami .
SFX 1075 N 1
SFX 1075 í ejší .
SFX 1076 N 1
SFX 1076 í ejšieho .
SFX 1077 N 1
SFX 1077 í ejšiemu .
SFX 1078 N 1
SFX 1078 í ejšom .
SFX 1079 N 1
SFX 1079 í ejším .
SFX 1080 N 1
SFX 1080 í ejších .
SFX 1081 N 1
SFX 1081 í ejšími .
SFX 1082 N 1
SFX 1082 í ejšie .
SFX 1083 N 1
SFX 1083 í ejšia .
SFX 1084 N 1
SFX 1084 í ejšej .
SFX 1085 N 1
SFX 1085 í ejšiu .
SFX 1086 N 1
SFX 1086 í ejšou .
SFX 1087 Y 1
SFX 1087 í ejší .
PFX 1087 Y 1
PFX 1087 0 naj .
SFX 1088 Y 1
SFX 1088 í ejšieho .
PFX 1088 Y 1
PFX 1088 0 naj .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 í ejšiemu .
PFX 1089 Y 1
PFX 1089 0 naj .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 í ejšom .
PFX 1090 Y 1
PFX 1090 0 naj .
SFX 1091 Y 1
SFX 1091 í ejším .
PFX 1091 Y 1
PFX 1091 0 naj .
SFX 1092 Y 1
SFX 1092 í ejších .
PFX 1092 Y 1
PFX 1092 0 naj .
SFX 1093 Y 1
SFX 1093 í ejšími .
PFX 1093 Y 1
PFX 1093 0 naj .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 í ejšie .
PFX 1094 Y 1
PFX 1094 0 naj .
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 í ejšia .
PFX 1095 Y 1
PFX 1095 0 naj .
SFX 1096 Y 1
SFX 1096 í ejšej .
PFX 1096 Y 1
PFX 1096 0 naj .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 í ejšiu .
PFX 1097 Y 1
PFX 1097 0 naj .
SFX 1098 Y 1
SFX 1098 í ejšou .
PFX 1098 Y 1
PFX 1098 0 naj .
SFX 1099 Y 1
SFX 1099 a 0 .
